Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.005

Findings.

The legislature finds that licensed advanced social workers and licensed independent clinical social workers represent different specializations within the social work profession, with each license signifying the highest degree of licensure as it pertains to each specialty. The legislature further finds that practitioners in each specialty exercise independent judgment and operate independently within their area of practice.

Therefore, for purposes of job classification, licensed advanced social workers and licensed independent clinical social workers licensed under this chapter shall both be considered the top tier of licensure for the profession.

[ 2013 c 73 s 1.]